Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 4

Secretarial Assistance

17-1-401. Provision for secretarial assistance.

Secretarial assistance to trial judges and chancellors of courts of record whose entire compensation is paid by this state shall be provided on the basis of need by the administrative director of the courts.

In addition to the judges and chancellors set out in subsection (a), the administrative director of the courts shall provide a salary supplement to an existing secretary to the judge of any court created by private act that is located in a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, if the judge of the local court has concurrent criminal and civil jurisdiction with judges of courts of record. The amount of the salary supplement shall be equal to the salary supplement provided a secretary of the circuit court of the county.

Acts 1967, ch. 175, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-120; Acts 1991, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 28, 29.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Law and Equity Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 361.

17-1-402. Fixing of salaries — Approval by chief justice — Payment.

All salaries for secretarial positions shall be fixed within the limits of the appropriation for the salaries by the administrative director of the courts and the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court.

The salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments out of the treasury upon the warrants of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1967, ch. 175, § 2; T.C.A., § 17-121; Acts 1993, ch. 66, § 30.

17-1-403. Sole authority authorizing secretarial assistance.

It is declared to be the legislative intent that this part shall supersede any and all existing general laws authorizing secretarial assistance for trial judges and chancellors or providing for their compensation, and that this part constitutes the sole authority for such purposes.

Acts 1967, ch. 175, § 3; T.C.A., § 17-122.